Hawaii statutes.
§351-32 Violent crimes. The crimes to
which part III of this chapter applies are the following and no other:

(1) Murder in the first degree (section 707-701);

(2) Murder in the second degree (section 707-701.5);

(3) Manslaughter (section 707-702);

(4) Negligent homicide in the first degree (section
707-702.5);

(5) Negligent homicide in the second degree (section
707-703);

(6) Negligent injury in the first degree (section
707-705);

(7) Negligent injury in the second degree (section
707-706);

(8) Assault in the first degree (section 707-710);

(9) Assault in the second degree (section 707-711);

(10) Assault in the third degree (section 707-712);

(11) Kidnapping (section 707-720);

(12) Sexual assault in the first degree (section
707-730);

(13) Sexual assault in the second degree (section
707-731);

(14) Sexual assault in the third degree (section
707-732);

(15) Sexual assault in the fourth degree (section
707-733);

(16) Abuse of family [or] household member (section
709-906); and

(17) Terrorism, as defined in title 18 United States
Code section 2331. [L 1967, c 226, pt of §1; HRS §351-32; am L 1973, c 85, §1;
am L 1975, c 138, §3; am L 1989, c 177, §9; am L 1998, c 239, §3]

Case Notes

Trial court was not authorized, under §706-605, to order defendant
to pay restitution to the Honolulu police department for its drug "buy
money" expenses where (1) it was unlikely that ordering defendant to pay
restitution would aid defendant in developing a degree of self-respect and
pride in knowing that defendant has righted the wrong committed; and (2)
department did not qualify as a "crime victim" under chapter 351 and
defendant's offenses did not qualify as a "violent crime" under this
section. 93 H. 34 (App.), 995 P.2d 335 (2000).

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next